Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.060

Fiscal—Validation and funding of debts.

The provisions of general law contained in chapters 35.40 and 39.90 RCW, relating to the validation and funding of debts and elections pertaining thereto is hereby recognized as applicable to code cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.060.]